Utah statutes.
4-20-9.   Commissioner to supervise distribution of undistributed funds if
United States alters or discontinues funding leaving funds or resources
available.
If the United States alters or discontinues funding under the Taylor Grazing
Act or the operation of advisory boards, leaving funds or other resources
undistributed or otherwise without means for continuation, the commissioner
shall supervise and control the distribution of such undistributed funds or
other resources.
